District of Columbia statutes.
32-1517

Assignment of compensation; exemption from claims of creditors.

No assignment, release, or commutation of compensation or benefits due or payable under this chapter, except as provided by this chapter, shall be valid, and such compensation and benefits shall be exempt from all claims or creditors and from levy, execution, and attachment or other remedy for recovery or collection of a debt, which exemption may not be waived.

July 1, 1980, D.C. Law 3-77, § 18, 27 DCR 2503

History

This section is referenced in § 32-1508.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 36-317.

Prior Codifications